California statutes. Civil Code
(C) Any photovoltaic device or technology that is integrated into a building, including, but not limited to, photovoltaic windows, siding, and roofing shingles or tiles.

(b) Any instrument creating a solar easement shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A description of the dimensions of the easement expressed in measurable terms, such as vertical or horizontal angles measured in degrees, or the hours of the day on specified dates during which direct sunlight to a specified surface of a solar collector, device, or structural design feature may not be obstructed, or a combination of these descriptions.

(2) The restrictions placed upon vegetation, structures, and other objects that would impair or obstruct the passage of sunlight through the easement.

(3) The terms or conditions, if any, under which the easement may
 be revised or terminated.

(c) As used in this section, “electric utility” means an electrical corporation as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code or a local publicly owned electric utility as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 235, Sec. 2.   (AB 1124)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

801.7.

(a) When a right-of-way is granted pursuant to Section 801 or 802 to a railroad corporation whose primary business is the transportation of passengers, the grant shall include, but not be limited to, a right-of-way for the location, construction, and maintenance of the railroad corporation’s necessary works and for every necessary adjunct thereto.

(b) A “railroad corporation” shall have the same definition as provided in Section 230 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1553, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

[802.]

Section Eight Hundred and Two. The following land burdens, or servitudes upon land, may be granted and held, though not attached to land:One—The right to pasture, and of fishing and taking game.

Two—The right of a seat in church.

Third—The right of burial.

Four—The right of taking rents and tolls.

Five—The right of way.

Six—The right of taking water, wood,
minerals, or other things.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

The land to which an easement is attached is called the dominant tenement; the land upon which a burden or servitude is laid is called the servient tenement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

A servitude can be created only by one who has a vested estate in the servient tenement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

A servitude thereon cannot be held by the owner of the servient tenement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

The extent of a servitude is determined by the terms of the grant, or the nature of the enjoyment by which it was acquired.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

In case of partition of the dominant tenement the burden must be apportioned according to the division of the dominant tenement, but not in such a way as to increase the burden upon the servient tenement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

The owner of a future estate in a dominant tenement may use easements attached thereto for the purpose of viewing waste, demanding rent, or removing an obstruction to the enjoyment of such easements, although such tenement is occupied by a tenant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

809.

The owner of any estate in a dominant tenement, or the occupant of such tenement, may maintain an action for the enforcement of an easement attached thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

810.

The owner in fee of a servient tenement may maintain an action for the possession of the land, against any one unlawfully possessed thereof, though a servitude exists thereon in favor of the public.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

811.

A servitude is extinguished:

1. By the vesting of the right to the servitude and the right to the servient tenement in the same person;

2. By the destruction of the servient tenement;

3. By the performance of any act upon either tenement, by the owner of the servitude, or with his assent, which is incompatible with its nature or exercise; or,

4. When the servitude was acquired by enjoyment, by disuse thereof by the owner of the
servitude for the period prescribed for acquiring title by enjoyment.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

813.

The holder of record title to land may record in the office of the recorder of any county in which any part of the land is situated, a description of said land and a notice reading substantially as follows: “The right of the public or any person to make any use whatsoever of the above described land or any portion thereof (other than any use expressly allowed by a written or recorded map, agreement, deed or dedication) is by permission, and subject to control, of owner: Section 813, Civil Code.”

The recorded notice is conclusive evidence that subsequent use of the land during the time such notice is in effect by the public or any
user for any purpose (other than any use expressly allowed by a written or recorded map, agreement, deed or dedication) is permissive and with consent in any judicial proceeding involving the issue as to whether all or any portion of such land has been dedicated to public use or whether any user has a prescriptive right in such land or any portion thereof. The notice may be revoked by the holder of record title by recording a notice of revocation in the office of the recorder wherein the notice is recorded. After recording a notice pursuant to this section, and prior to any revocation thereof, the owner shall not prevent any public use appropriate thereto by physical obstruction, notice or otherwise.

In the event of use by other than the general public, any such notices, to be effective, shall also be served by registered mail on the user.

The recording of a notice pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to affect
rights vested at the time of recording.

The permission for public use of real property provided for in such a recorded notice may be conditioned upon reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of such public use, and no use in violation of such restrictions shall be considered public use for purposes of a finding of implied dedication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 941.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Conservation Easements [815. - 816.]

815.

The Legislature finds and declares that the preservation of land in its natural, scenic, agricultural, historical, forested, or open-space condition is among the most important environmental assets of California. The Legislature further finds and declares it to be the public policy and in the public interest of this state to encourage the voluntary conveyance of conservation easements to qualified nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, “conservation easement” means any limitation in a deed, will, or other instrument in the form of an easement, restriction, covenant, or condition, which is or has been executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land subject to such easement and is binding upon successive owners of such land, and the purpose of which is to retain land predominantly in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.2.

(a) A conservation easement is an interest in real property voluntarily created and freely transferable in whole or in part for the purposes stated in Section 815.1 by any lawful method for the transfer of interests in real property in this state.

(b) A conservation easement shall be perpetual in duration.

(c) A conservation easement shall not be deemed personal in nature and shall constitute an interest in real property notwithstanding the fact that it may be negative in character.

(d) The particular characteristics of a conservation easement shall be those granted or specified in the instrument creating or transferring the easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.3.

Only the following entities or organizations may acquire and hold conservation easements:

(a) A tax-exempt nonprofit organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and qualified to do business in this state which has as its primary purpose the preservation, protection, or enhancement of land in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition or use.

(b) The state or any
city, county, city and county, district, or other state or local governmental entity, if otherwise authorized to acquire and hold title to real property and if the conservation easement is voluntarily conveyed. No local governmental entity may condition the issuance of an entitlement for use on the applicant’s granting of a conservation easement pursuant to this chapter.

(c) A federally recognized California Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized California Native American tribe that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission to protect a California Native American prehistoric, archaeological, cultural, spiritual, or ceremonial place, if the conservation easement is voluntarily conveyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

815.4.

All interests not transferred and conveyed by the instrument creating the easement shall remain in the grantor of the easement, including the right to engage in all uses of the land not affected by the easement nor prohibited by the easement or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.5.

Instruments creating, assigning, or otherwise transferring conservation easements shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the land is situated, in whole or in part, and such instruments shall be subject in all respects to the recording laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.7.

(a) No conservation easement shall be unenforceable by reason of lack of privity of contract or lack of benefit to particular land or because not expressed in the instrument creating it as running with the land.

(b) Actual or threatened injury to or impairment of a conservation easement or actual or threatened violation of its terms may be prohibited or restrained, or the interest intended for protection by such easement may be enforced, by injunctive relief granted by any court of competent jurisdiction in a proceeding initiated by the grantor or by the owner of the easement.

(c) In addition to the remedy of injunctive relief, the holder of a conservation easement shall be entitled to recover money damages for any injury to such easement or to the interest being protected thereby or for the violation of the terms of such easement. In assessing such damages there may be taken into account, in addition to the cost of restoration and other usual rules of the law of damages, the loss of scenic, aesthetic, or environmental value to the real property subject to the easement.

(d) The court may award to the prevailing party in any action authorized by this section the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.9.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair or conflict with the operation of any law or statute conferring upon any political subdivision the right or power to hold interests in land comparable to conservation easements, including, but not limited to, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 6950) of Division 7 of Title 1 of, Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 51050), Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 51070) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of, and Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 65560) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of, the Government Code, and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 421) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of
Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

815.10.

A conservation easement granted pursuant to this chapter constitutes an enforceable restriction, for purposes of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 777, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

816.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate the policy and purpose of Section 815.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Greenway Easements [816.50. - 816.66.]

816.50.

The Legislature finds and declares the following with regard to the development of greenways along urban waterways:

(a) The restoration and preservation of land in its natural, scenic, forested, recreational, or open-space condition is among the most important environmental assets in California.

(b) Greenways have the potential to improve the quality of
life in, and connectivity between, communities, and provide important recreational, open-space, wildlife, flood management, greenhouse gas reduction, and urban waterfront revitalization opportunities.

(c) It is the policy of the Legislature and in the best interest in the state to encourage the voluntary conveyance of greenway easements to qualified nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.52.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Adjacent” means within 400 yards from the property boundary of an existing urban waterway.

(2) This subdivision does not create a new authority to place or extend an easement on private property that is
not part of a voluntary agreement.

(b) “Greenway” means a pedestrian and bicycle, nonmotorized vehicle transportation, and recreational travel corridor that meets the following requirements:

(1) Includes landscaping that improves rivers and streams, provides flood protection benefits, and incorporates the significance and value of natural, historical, and cultural resources, as documented in the local agency’s applicable planning document, including, but not limited to, a master plan, a general plan, or a specific plan.

(2) Is separated and protected from shared roadways, is adjacent to an urban waterway, and incorporates both ease of access to nearby communities and an array of amenities within an urbanized area and services for the users of the corridor and nearby communities.

(3) Is located on public lands or private lands, or a combination of public and private lands, where public access to those lands for greenway purposes has been legally authorized by, or legally obtained from, the fee owner of the land and, if applicable, the operator of any facility or improvement located on the land, through leases, easements, or other agreements entered into by the fee owner and the operator of any affected facility or improvement on the land.

(4) Reflects design standards regarding appropriate widths, clearances, setbacks from obstructions, and centerlines protecting directional travel, and other considerations, as appropriate, that are applicable for each affected local agency, as documented in the local agency’s applicable planning document, including, but not limited to, a master plan, general plan, or specific plan, and that are consistent with plans and
facilities for controlling the floodwater of rivers and their tributaries, as applicable.

(5) May incorporate appropriate lighting, public amenities within an urbanized area, art, and other features that are consistent with a local agency’s planning document, including, but not limited to, a general plan, master plan, or specific plan.

(c) “Greenway easement” means any limitation in a deed, will, or other instrument in the form of an easement, restriction, covenant, or condition that is or has been executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land subject to the easement and is binding upon successive owners of that land, for either of the following purposes:

(1) Developing greenways adjacent to urban waterways consistent with restoration efforts undertaken at those waterways at the time of the creation of the
easement, if any. 

(2) Preserving greenways adjacent to urban waterways.

(d) “Local agency” means a city, county, or city and county.

(e) “Urbanized area” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21071 of the Public Resources Code.

(f) “Urban waterway” means a creek, stream, or river that crosses (1) developed residential, commercial, or industrial property or (2) open space where the land use is designated as residential, commercial, or industrial, as referenced in a local agency’s planning document, including, but not limited to, a general plan, master plan, or specific general plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   (AB 2651)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.54.

(a) A greenway easement is an interest in real property voluntarily created and freely transferable in whole or in part for the purposes stated in subdivision (c) of Section 816.52 by any lawful method for the transfer of interests in real property in this state.

(b) A greenway easement shall be perpetual in duration.

(c) Notwithstanding the fact that it may be negative in character, a greenway easement is not personal in nature and shall constitute an interest in real property.

(d) The particular characteristics of a greenway easement shall be those granted or specified in the instrument creating or transferring the easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.56.

Only the following entities or organizations may acquire and hold a greenway easement:

(a) A tax-exempt nonprofit organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and qualified to do business in this state that has as its primary purpose the preservation, protection, or enhancement of land in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition or use, or the
preservation or development of a greenway.

(b) The state or any city, county, city and county, district, or other state or local governmental entity, if otherwise authorized to acquire and hold title to real property and if the greenway easement is voluntarily conveyed. A local governmental entity shall not condition the issuance of an entitlement for use on the applicant’s granting of a greenway easement pursuant to this chapter.

(c) A federally recognized California Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized California Native American tribe that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission to protect a California Native American prehistoric, archaeological, cultural, spiritual, or ceremonial place, if the greenway easement is voluntarily conveyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.58.

All interests not transferred and conveyed by the instrument creating the greenway easement shall remain in the grantor of the greenway easement, including the right to engage in all uses of the land not affected by the greenway easement nor prohibited by the greenway easement or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.60.

Instruments creating, assigning, or otherwise transferring greenway easements shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the land is situated, in whole or in part, and those instruments shall be subject in all respects to the recording laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.62.

(a) No greenway easement shall be unenforceable by reason of lack of privity of contract or lack of benefit to particular land or because not expressed in the instrument creating it as running with the land.

(b) Actual or threatened injury to or impairment of a greenway easement or actual or threatened violation of its terms may be prohibited or restrained, or the interest intended for protection
by that easement may be enforced, by injunctive relief granted by any court of competent jurisdiction in a proceeding initiated by the grantor or by the owner of the greenway easement.

(c) In addition to the remedy of injunctive relief, the holder of a greenway easement shall be entitled to recover money damages for any injury to the greenway easement or to the interest being protected thereby or for the violation of the terms of the greenway easement. In assessing the damages, there may be taken into account, in addition to the cost of restoration and other usual rules of the law of damages, the loss of scenic, aesthetic, or environmental value to the real property subject to the greenway easement.

(d) The court may award to the prevailing party in any action authorized by this section the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.64.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair or conflict with the operation of any law or statute conferring upon any political subdivision the right or power to hold interests in land comparable to greenway easements, including, but not limited to, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 6950) of Division 7 of Title 1 of, Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 51050), Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 51070) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1
of Title 5 of, and Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 65560) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of, the Government Code, and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 421) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

816.66.

A greenway easement granted pursuant to this chapter constitutes an enforceable restriction, for purposes of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Housing Cooperatives and Housing Cooperative Trusts [817. - 817.4.]

817.

“Limited-equity housing cooperative” or a “workforce housing cooperative trust” means a corporation organized on a cooperative basis that, in addition to complying with Section 817.1 as may be applicable, meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The corporation is any of the following:

(1) Organized as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to
Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(2) Holds title to real property as the beneficiary of a trust providing for distribution for public or charitable purposes upon termination of the trust.

(3) Holds title to real property subject to conditions that will result in reversion to a public or charitable entity upon dissolution of the corporation.

(4) Holds a leasehold interest, of at least 20 years’ duration, conditioned on the corporation’s continued qualification under this section, and provides for reversion to a public entity or charitable corporation.

(b) (1) The articles of incorporation or bylaws require the purchase and sale of the stock or membership interest of resident owners who cease to be
permanent residents, at no more than a transfer value determined as provided in the articles or bylaws, and that shall not exceed the aggregate of the following:

(A) The consideration paid for the membership or shares by the first occupant of the unit involved, as shown on the books of the corporation.

(B) The value, as determined by the board of directors of the corporation, of any improvements installed at the expense of the member or a prior member with the prior approval of the board of directors.

(C) Accumulated simple interest, an inflation allowance at a rate that may be based on a cost-of-living index, an income index, or market-interest index, or compound interest if specified in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. For newly formed corporations, accumulated simple interest shall apply. Any increment
pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed a 10-percent annual increase on the consideration paid for the membership or share by the first occupant of the unit involved.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for purposes of a return of transfer value, both of the following are prohibited:

(i) A board of directors returning transfer value, either full or partial, to a member while he or she still remains a member.

(ii) An existing member accepting the return of his or her transfer value, either full or partial.

(B) A board of directors may return to an existing member and the existing member may accept return of his or her transfer value in the event that the member moves within the cooperative from a category of unit
initially valued at a higher price to a different category of unit valued at a lower price.

(c) The articles of incorporation or bylaws require the board of directors to sell the stock or membership interest purchased as provided in subdivision (b) to new member-occupants or resident shareholders at a price that does not exceed the “transfer value” paid for the unit.

(d) The “corporate equity,” that is defined as the excess of the current fair market value of the corporation’s real property over the sum of the current transfer values of all shares or membership interests, reduced by the principal balance of outstanding encumbrances upon the corporate real property as a whole, shall be applied as follows:

(1) So long as any such encumbrance remains outstanding, the corporate equity shall not be used for distribution
to members, but only for the following purposes, and only to the extent authorized by the board, subject to the provisions and limitations of the articles of incorporation and bylaws:

(A) For the benefit of the corporation or the improvement of the real property.

(B) For expansion of the corporation by acquisition of additional real property.

(C) For public benefit or charitable purposes.

(2) Upon sale of the property, dissolution of the corporation, or occurrence of a condition requiring termination of the trust or reversion of title to the real property, the corporate equity is required by the articles, bylaws, or trust or title conditions to be paid out, or title to the property transferred, subject to outstanding encumbrances and liens, for the
transfer value of membership interests or shares, for use for a public or charitable purpose.

(e) Amendment of the bylaws and articles of incorporation requires the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the resident-owner members or shareholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

817.1.

(a) A “workforce housing cooperative trust” is an entity organized pursuant to this section that complies with Section 817 and with all of the following:

(1) Allows the governing board to be composed of two classes of board members. One class is elected by the residents, and one class is appointed by sponsor organizations, including employer and employee organizations, chambers of commerce,
government entities, unions, religious organizations, nonprofit organizations, cooperative organizations, and other forms of organizations. Resident members shall elect a majority of the board members. However, sponsor organizations may appoint up to one less than a majority of the board members. The numerical composition and class of the sponsor and resident board members shall be set in the articles of incorporation and in the bylaws.

(2) Requires the charter board of a workforce housing cooperative trust to be composed of only sponsor board members, to remain in place for one year after the first resident occupancy. One year after the first resident occupancy, the resident members shall elect a single board member. Three years after the first resident occupancy, resident members shall elect a majority of the board members.

(3) Prohibits the removal of the appointees of sponsor
organizations, except for cause.

(4) Allows for the issuance of separate classes of shares to sponsor organizations or support organizations. These shares shall be denominated as “workforce housing shares” and shall receive a rate of return of no more than 10 percent simple interest pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 817.

(5) Requires, in order to amend the bylaws or articles of incorporation of a workforce housing cooperative trust, the affirmative vote of at least a majority of the resident-owner members or shareholders and a majority of each class of board members. The rights of the sponsor board members or the sponsors shall not be changed without the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the sponsor board members.

(b) A workforce housing cooperative trust shall be entitled to
operate at multiple locations in order to sponsor limited-equity housing cooperatives. A workforce housing cooperative trust may either own or lease land for the purpose of developing limited-equity housing cooperatives.

(c) A workforce housing cooperative trust may be created when at least 51 percent of the occupied units in a multifamily property that is in foreclosure support efforts to buy the building or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

817.2.

The procedure for the dissolution of a limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust that receives or has received a public subsidy shall be as follows:

(a) The city, or the county for any unincorporated area, in which the limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust is located, shall hold a public hearing. The cooperative or trust shall pay for all costs
associated with the public hearing.

(b) The city or county shall provide notice to all interested parties. The notice shall be given at least 120 days prior to the date of the hearing. The city or county shall obtain a list of all other limited-equity housing cooperatives and cooperative development organizations in the state from the California Center for Cooperative Development, if the list exists, and provide notice to all of the entities on the list in an effort to create a merger with an existing limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust. The notice shall be mailed first class, postage prepaid, in the United States mail.

(c) If the dissolving limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust merges with an existing cooperative or trust, to the extent possible, the merger shall be with the geographically closest
cooperative or trust.

(d) If the dissolving limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust does not merge with an existing cooperative or trust, both of the following shall occur:

(1) Upon completion of the public hearing required pursuant to subdivision (a), the city or county shall adopt a resolution approving of the dissolution and make a finding that the dissolution plan meets the requirements of state and federal law, meets the donative intent standards of the United States Internal Revenue Service, and is free of private inurement, which includes, but is not limited to, a prohibition on any member receiving any payment in excess of the transfer value to which he or she is entitled pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 817.

(2) The city or county shall forward all of the information
and written testimony from the hearing to the Office of the Attorney General for the Attorney General to consider as part of his or her ruling on the dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

817.3.

Each entity named as a sponsor organization of a workforce housing cooperative trust formed pursuant to Section 817 shall have the legal standing of a member unless it revokes, in writing, its sponsorship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

817.4.

(a) In any action instituted on or after January 1, 2010, against a board of directors and its members based upon a breach of corporate or fiduciary duties or a failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, a prevailing plaintiff may recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(b) If an organization formed under this chapter uses public funds, it shall not use any corporate funds to
avoid compliance with this chapter or to pursue dissolution if the intent or outcome is for some or all of the members to receive any payment in excess of the transfer value to which he or she is entitled pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 817.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   (AB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF OWNERS [818. - 855.]



  CHAPTER 1. Rights of Owners [818. - 835.]



  ARTICLE 1. Incidents of Ownership [818. - 827.]

818.

The owner of a life estate may use the land in the same manner as the owner of a fee simple, except that he must do no act to the injury of the inheritance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

819.

A tenant for years or at will, unless he is a wrong-doer by holding over, may occupy the buildings, take the annual products of the soil, work mines and quarries open at the commencement of his tenancy.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

820.

A tenant for years or at will has no other rights to the property than such as are given to him by the agreement or instrument by which his tenancy is acquired, or by the last section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

A person to whom any real property is transferred or devised, upon which rent has been reserved, or to whom any such rent is transferred, is entitled to the same remedies for recovery of rent, for non-performance of any of the terms of the lease, or for any waste or cause of forfeiture, as his grantor or devisor might have had.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

Whatever remedies the lessor of any real property has against his immediate lessee for the breach of any agreement in the lease, or for recovery of the possession, he has against the assignees of the lessee, for any cause of action accruing while they are such assignees, except where the assignment is made by way of security for a loan, and is not accompanied by possession of the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

Whatever remedies the lessee of any real property may have against his immediate lessor, for the breach of any agreement in the lease, he may have against the assigns of the lessor, and the assigns of the lessee may have against the lessor and his assigns, except upon covenants against incumbrances or relating to the title or possession of the premises.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

Rent due upon a lease for life may be recovered in the same manner as upon a lease for years.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

Rent dependent on the life of a person may be recovered after as well as before his death.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

A person having an estate in fee, in remainder or reversion, may maintain an action for any injury done to the inheritance, notwithstanding an intervening estate for life or years, and although, after its commission, his estate is transferred, and he has no interest in the property at the commencement of the action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in all leases of lands or tenements, or of any interest therein, from week to week, month to month, or other period less than a month, the landlord may, upon giving notice in writing to the tenant, in the manner prescribed by Section 1162 of the Code of Civil Procedure, change the terms of the lease to take effect, as to tenancies for less than one month, upon the expiration of a period at least as long as the term of the hiring itself, and, as to tenancies from month to month, to take effect at the expiration of not less than 30 days, but if that change takes effect within a rental term, the rent accruing from the first day of the term to the date of that change shall be computed at the rental rate obtained immediately prior to that change; provided, however,
 that it shall be competent for the parties to provide by an agreement in writing that a notice changing the terms thereof may be given at any time not less than seven days before the expiration of a term, to be effective upon the expiration of the term.

(2) The notice, when served upon the tenant, shall in and of itself operate and be effectual to create and establish, as a part of the lease, the terms, rents, and conditions specified in the notice, if the tenant shall continue to hold the premises after the notice takes effect.

(b) (1) In all leases of a residential dwelling, commercial real property by a qualified commercial tenant, or of any interest therein, from week to week, month to month, or other period less than a month, the landlord may increase the rent provided in the lease or rental agreement, upon giving written notice to the tenant, as
 follows, by either of the following procedures:

(A) By delivering a copy to the tenant personally.

(B) By serving a copy by mail under the procedures prescribed in Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) If the proposed rent increase for that tenant is 10 percent or less of the rental amount charged to that tenant at any time during the 12 months before the effective date of the increase, either in and of itself or when combined with any other rent increases for the 12 months before the effective date of the increase, the notice shall be delivered at least 30 days before the effective date of the increase, and subject to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure if served by mail.

(3) (A) If the proposed rent increase